vi: Phạm vi phủ sóng bản đồ (bầu trời/hành tinh): Trái Đất (nhìn từ vũ trụ); Sao Mộc; Sao Hỏa; Mặt Trăng; Bầu trời đêm/chòm sao; Sao Thổ; Hệ mặt trời (tổng quan); Khác
cs: Pokrytí mapou (obloha/planetární těleso): Země (pohled z vesmíru); Jupiter; Mars; Měsíc; Noční obloha / souhvězdí; Saturn; Sluneční soustava (přehled); Jiné
nb: Kartdekning (himmel-/planetlegeme): Jorden (sett fra verdensrommet); Jupiter; Mars; Månen; Nattehimmel/stjernebilder; Saturn; Solsystemet (oversikt); Annet
th: ขอบเขตการครอบคลุมของแผนที่ (ท้องฟ้า/ดาวเคราะห์): โลก (มุมมองจากอวกาศ); ดาวพฤหัสบดี; ดาวอังคาร; ดวงจันทร์; ท้องฟ้ายามค่ำคืน / กลุ่มดาว; ดาวเสาร์; ระบบสุริยะ (ภาพรวม); อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Обхват на картата (небе/планетарно тяло): Земя (изглед от космоса); Юпитер; Марс; Луна; Нощно небе / съзвездия; Сатурн; Слънчева система (общ изглед); Друго
nl: Kaart dekking (hemel/planeetlichaam): Aarde (ruimte-aanzicht); Jupiter; Mars; Maan; Nachtelijke hemel / sterrenbeelden; Saturnus; Zonnestelsel (overzicht); Anders
zh-TW: 地圖涵蓋範圍（星空/行星天體）: 地球 (太空視角); 木星; 火星; 月球; 夜空/星座; 土星; 太陽系 (總覽); 其他
ko: 지도 표기 범위(천체/행성체): 지구(우주 뷰); 목성; 화성; 달; 밤하늘/별자리; 토성; 태양계(개요); 기타
de: Kartenabdeckung (Himmel/Himmelskörper): Erde (Ansicht aus dem Weltraum); Jupiter; Mars; Mond; Sternenhimmel / Sternbilder; Saturn; Sonnensystem (Übersicht); Sonstige
da: Kortdækning (himmel/planetlegeme): Jorden (set fra rummet); Jupiter; Mars; Månen; Nattehimmel/stjernebilleder; Saturn; Solsystem (oversigt); Andet
hr-HR: Pokrivenost karte (nebo/planetarno tijelo): Zemlja (pogled iz svemira); Jupiter; Mars; Mjesec; Noćno nebo / zviježđa; Saturn; Sunčev sustav (pregled); Ostalo
el: Κάλυψη χάρτη (ουράνιο/πλανητικό σώμα): Γη (από το διάστημα); Δίας; Άρης; Σελήνη; Νυχτερινός ουρανός / αστερισμοί; Κρόνος; Ηλιακό σύστημα (επισκόπηση); Άλλο
ja: 地図の範囲（空／惑星本体）: 地球 (宇宙視点); 木星; 火星; 月; 夜空 / 星座; 土星; 太陽系 (全体図); その他
tr: Harita kapsamı (gökyüzü/gezegen cismi): Dünya (uzay görünümü); Jüpiter; Mars; Ay; Gece gökyüzü/takımyıldızları; Satürn; Güneş sistemi (genel bakış); Diğer
ru: Охват карты (небо/планеты): Земля (вид из космоса); Юпитер; Марс; Луна; Ночное небо / созвездия; Сатурн; Солнечная система (обзор); Другое
hu: Térkép lefedettsége (égbolt/bolygótest): Föld (űrből nézve); Jupiter; Mars; Hold; Éjszakai égbolt / csillagképek; Szaturnusz; Naprendszer (áttekintő); Egyéb
it: Copertura della mappa (cielo/corpo planetario): Terra (vista dallo spazio); Giove; Marte; Luna; Cielo notturno / costellazioni; Saturno; Sistema solare (panoramica); Altro
es: Cobertura cartográfica (cielo/cuerpo planetario): Tierra (vista desde el espacio); Júpiter; Marte; Luna; Cielo nocturno/constelaciones; Saturno; Sistema solar (vista general); Otro
pt-BR: Mapa cobertura (céu/corpo planetário): Terra (vista do espaço); Júpiter; Marte; Lua; Céu noturno/constelações; Saturno; Sistema solar (visão geral); Outro
pl: Pokrycie mapy (niebo/ciało planetarne): Ziemia (widok z kosmosu); Jowisz; Mars; Księżyc; Nocne niebo / konstelacje; Saturn; Układ Słoneczny (przegląd); Inne
pt-PT: Cobertura do mapa (céu/corpo celeste): Terra (vista do espaço); Júpiter; Marte; Lua; Céu noturno/constelações; Saturno; Sistema Solar (visão geral); Outro
sl-SI: Pokritost karte (nebo/planetarno telo): Zemlja (pogled iz vesolja); Jupiter; Mars; Luna; Nočno nebo / ozvezdja; Saturn; Osončje (pregled); Drugo
fr: Sujet de la carte (ciel/corps planétaire): Terre (vue de l’espace); Jupiter; Mars; Lune; Ciel nocturne / constellations; Saturne; Système solaire (vue d’ensemble); Autre
en: Map coverage (sky/planet body): Earth (space view); Jupiter; Mars; Moon; Night sky / constellations; Saturn; Solar system (overview); Other
fi: Kartan kattavuus (taivas/planeetat): Maa (avaruusnäkymä); Jupiter; Mars; Kuu; Yötaivas / tähtikuviot; Saturnus; Aurinkokunta (yleiskatsaus); Muu
lt-LT: Žemėlapio aprėptis (dangus / planetos kūnas): Žemė (vaizdas iš kosmoso); Jupiteris; Marsas; Mėnulis; Naktinis dangus / žvaigždynai; Saturnas; Saulės sistema (apžvalga); Kita
sv: Karttäckning (himmel/planetkropp): Jorden (rymdvy); Jupiter; Mars; Månen; Natthimlen / stjärnbilder; Saturnus; Solsystemet (översikt); Annat
ro-RO: Acoperirea hărții (cer/corp planetar): Pământul (vedere din spațiu); Jupiter; Marte; Luna; Cerul nopții / constelații; Saturn; Sistemul solar (vedere de ansamblu); Altele
zh-CN: 地图覆盖范围（天空/行星）: 地球（太空视角）; 木星; 火星; 月球; 夜空/星座; 土星; 太阳系（概览）; 其他
sk-SK: Pokrytie mapy (obloha/nebeské teleso): Zem (pohľad z vesmíru); Jupiter; Mars; Mesiac; Nočná obloha / súhvezdia; Saturn; Slnečná sústava (prehľad); Iné